Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.170

Duplicate licenses—Fee.

A fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 shall be charged for every duplicate license issued by the secretary.

[ 1996 c 191 s 15; 1991 c 3 s 66; 1985 c 7 s 25; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 29; 1957 c 52 s 25. Prior: 1935 c 112 s 11, part; RRS s 10031-11, part.]